Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8203
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Captive Insurers Act:

(1) Affiliated entity means any entity that directly or indirectly controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with a captive insurer;

(2) Captive insurer means a domestic insurer authorized under the act to provide insurance and reinsurance to its parent, any affiliated entity, or both. Such insurance and reinsurance shall be limited to the risks, hazards, and liabilities of its parent and affiliated entities;

(3) Control means the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of an entity through ownership of voting securities;

(4) Director means the Director of Insurance; and

(5) Parent means an entity that directly or indirectly owns, controls, or holds, with power to vote, more than fifty percent of the outstanding voting securities or other ownership interest of a captive insurer.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 37.